Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions
28-1-14.1.
Requirements for revising districts; proposed plans submitted electronically; legislative requirements.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, a local bill for revising the districts of county boards of commissioners, county boards of education, independent boards of education, or municipal governing authorities, or creating districts for such offices, shall not be considered by the General Assembly unless such bill meets the requirements of this Code section.

A plan to revise districts or to create districts for existing offices contained in a local bill described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall either:

Be drawn by the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly; or

Be submitted to and certified by the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly prior to being adopted by the local governmental entity for whom such districts are to be revised or created in accordance with this Code section.

If a districting plan is to be drawn by the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly, the local governmental entity whose districts are to be revised or created shall contact a member of the General Assembly who represents such area in which such local governmental entity is located, either in whole or in part, and request that the member provide a letter of sponsorship, either in written or electronic format, directed to the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly, authorizing its staff to work with the representatives of such local governmental entity to prepare the districting plan. In lieu of authorizing representatives of the local governmental entity to work with such office, the member may work directly with the office in preparing the plan.

If the local governmental entity chooses a source other than the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly to prepare a plan to revise its districts or to create districts, such local governmental entity shall, prior to voting to accept such plan, submit the plan to the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly for review. The local governmental entity shall obtain a sponsorship letter from a member of the General Assembly who represents that entity as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, authorizing the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly to review such plan. Upon receipt of such letter and the associated plan, the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly shall perform a technical review of the proposed plan to determine if the plan complies with federal and state constitutional requirements for such plans and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended. Such office shall also review the plan to determine if such plan divides current voting precincts in a manner that could potentially compromise voter anonymity, leaves any geographic unassigned areas, maintains continuous geographic features, and any other concerns that such office may deem legally significant.

If the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly finds such plan to be technically sound, that office shall issue a certification form to the local governmental entity, which may then proceed to adopt the proposed plan for submission to the General Assembly for enactment. The staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly shall prepare a legal description based on such plan for submission to the Office of Legislative Counsel for drafting the necessary legislation.

If the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly uncovers technical concerns in its review of the proposed plan, the staff shall notify the local governmental entity and the member who sponsored the review of the concerns. In light of the technical concerns uncovered in the review, the local governmental entity shall then have the option of either having the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly make the necessary corrections to the proposed plan and return it to the local governmental entity for approval for submission for legislation to be prepared by a member of the General Assembly who represents, in whole or in part, the area in which the local governmental entity is located, or it may have the original preparer revise it. If the original preparer is chosen to revise the plan, such plan shall be resubmitted for review by the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly in accordance with this Code section.

A plan to create districts for a new municipality contained in a local bill described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall either:

If a districting plan is to be drawn by the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly, the entity seeking to create the new municipality shall contact a member of the General Assembly and request that the member provide a letter of sponsorship, either in written or electronic format, directed to the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly, authorizing its staff to work with the representatives of such entity to prepare the districting plan. In lieu of authorizing representatives of the entity to work with such office, the member may work directly with the office in preparing the plan.

If the entity seeking to create the new municipality chooses a source other than the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly to prepare a districting plan, such entity shall submit such plan to the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly for review. Such entity shall obtain a sponsorship letter from a member of the General Assembly as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, authorizing the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly to review such plan. Upon receipt of such letter and the associated plan, the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly shall perform a technical review of the proposed plan to determine if the plan complies with federal and state constitutional requirements for such plans and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended. Such office shall also review the plan to determine if such plan divides current voting precincts in a manner that could potentially compromise voter anonymity, leaves any geographic unassigned areas, maintains continuous geographic features, and any other concerns that such office may deem legally significant.

If the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly finds such plan to be technically sound, that office shall issue a certification form to the entity seeking to create a new municipality, which may then proceed to submit such plan to the General Assembly for enactment. The staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly shall prepare a legal description based on such plan for submission to the Office of Legislative Counsel for drafting the necessary legislation.

If the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly uncovers technical concerns in its review of the proposed plan, the staff shall notify the entity and the member who sponsored the review of the concerns. In light of the technical concerns uncovered in the review, the entity shall then have the option of either having the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly make the necessary corrections to the proposed plan and return it to the entity for submission to a member of the General Assembly for legislation to be prepared by the Office of Legislative Counsel, or it may have the original preparer revise it. If the original preparer is chosen to revise the plan, such plan shall be resubmitted for review by the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly in accordance with this Code section.

Proposed districting plans from a source other than the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly shall be submitted for review by such office in electronic format. Such submission shall contain:

Information regarding the contact person for the proposed plan, including email and telephone number;

The name of the submitter and the name of the local governmental entity that is the subject of the plan, if different;

An electronic map image that clearly depicts defined boundaries, utilizing the most recent United States census geographic boundaries, and a block equivalency file containing two columns. The first column shall list the 15-digit census block identification numbers, and the second column shall list the three-digit district identification number. Both block and district numbers shall be zero-filled text files. Such files shall be submitted in .xls, .xlsx, .dbf, .txt, or .csv file formats;

Statistical information on the plan which shall include, but not be limited to, the total population in each district and the population deviations of each district; and

Such other information as required by the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly.

If a member of the General Assembly desires to proceed with a local bill containing a districting plan which the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly has not certified, the member may do so only if a letter from such office is attached to the local bill when it is introduced in the General Assembly, stating that the bill cannot be certified by such office under this Code section and the reasons why.

(A)

Be drawn by the staff of the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly; or

(B)

Be submitted to and certified by the Legislative and Congressional Reapportionment Office of the General Assembly prior to being submitted to the Office of Legislative Counsel for drafting.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-1-14.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 804, § 1/SB 177; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 28/SB 429.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 28-1-14.1, relating to local bills proposing annexation by municipalities and providing copies to county governing authority, was based on Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 28, and was repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 985, §
1, effective May 14, 2002.

28-1-15.
Restrictions on population bills; “population bill” defined.

This Code section is passed pursuant to the authority of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph IV, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution, and no population bill shall be passed and no bill using classification by population as a means of determining the applicability of any bill or law to any political subdivision or group of political subdivisions may expressly or impliedly amend, modify, supersede, or repeal this Code section.

As used in this Code section, “political subdivision” means any county, municipality, county school district, independent school district, judicial circuit, militia district, or any other geographical area of the state which does not include the entire area of the state.

Except as provided in this subsection, “population bill” means any bill using classification by population as a means of determining the applicability of any bill or law to any political subdivision or group of political subdivisions of the state. “Population bill” shall not include the following:

A bill applicable to one specified type of political subdivision and containing a combination of population classifications which includes the population of and affects all political subdivisions of the type specified, including but not limited to state-wide minimum salary bills for county officers;

A bill classifying political subdivisions having less than a specified population and affecting three or more such political subdivisions; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to or affect the legality of any bills classifying political subdivisions having less than a specified population enacted prior to July 1, 1988, or which become effective July 1, 1988;

A bill classifying political subdivisions having more than a specified population and affecting three or more such political subdivisions; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to or affect:

The legality of any bills classifying political subdivisions having more than a specified population enacted prior to July 1, 1988, or which become effective July 1, 1988; or

The passage or legality of any bills amending bills referred to in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph with respect to specific subject matter contained in such bills on July 1, 1988;

A bill classifying political subdivisions on the basis of the population of standard metropolitan statistical areas and affecting three or more such political subdivisions; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to or affect the legality of any bills classifying on the basis of the population of standard metropolitan statistical areas enacted prior to July 1, 1988, or which become effective July 1, 1988;

A bill amending a law which classifies political subdivisions on the basis of population if that amendment merely changes the population classification of such law so as to permit that law to remain applicable to those political subdivisions to which that law was applicable immediately prior to the time the most recent census figures became applicable to those political subdivisions; or

A bill repealing a law which classifies on the basis of population.

In order to be permissible under the foregoing exceptions, a bill must fit within only one of the foregoing exceptions; and any bill which uses two or more of the foregoing classification devices shall be a prohibited “population bill.”

The salary of any officer, official, or employee of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision; provided, however, that the limitation provided for in this subparagraph shall not apply to state-wide minimum salary bills for county officers which are authorized under paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Code section; or

The property, affairs, or operation of the governing authority of a county or municipality, including, but not limited to, any matters pertaining to municipal annexation, deannexation, incorporation, or dissolution.

(c.1) (1)

A population bill shall also mean any bill using classification by population as a means of determining the applicability of any bill or law to any political subdivision or group of political subdivisions of the state with respect to the following:

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to invalidate any judicially imposed requirements for Acts classifying on the basis of population.

(2)

Except as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, any population bill which meets any of the classification criteria of this subsection shall be a prohibited population bill even if such bill is described in paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (c) of this Code section. Any such bill enacted prior to July 1, 1997, or which became effective July 1, 1997, may thereafter be repealed as authorized under paragraph (6) of subsection (c) of this Code section or may only be amended as authorized under paragraph (5) of subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-1-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1205, § 2; Code 1981, §

28-1-15

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 28; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1547, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1308, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references.

Prohibition of population bills, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 646, § 2 and Ga. L. 1983, p. 1205, § 2 both enacted Code sections designated as “28-1-14.” The Code section enacted by the latter Act was redesignated as “28-1-15” by Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 28, effective February 3, 1984.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1205, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article III, Section VI, Paragraph IV, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

28-1-16.
Issuance of subpoenas by Superior Court of Fulton County on behalf of the Committees on Ethics of the Senate and House of Representatives.

If the Committee on Ethics of the Senate or House of Representatives determines that the effective functioning of the committee requires the issuance of compulsory process to secure the attendance of a witness or the production of documents and materials, or if a person whose conduct is called into question in an investigation or other proceeding requests the issuance of such compulsory process, the chairperson or acting chairperson shall make application in writing to the presiding judge of the Superior Court of Fulton County for the issuance of an appropriate subpoena. Such application shall:

Describe in general terms the investigation or other proceeding for which the issuance of subpoena is sought and identify the provisions of the Senate or House rules authorizing the committee to conduct such investigation or proceeding;

In the case of process to secure the attendance of a witness, identify the witness; the general nature of the questions to be propounded to the witness; and the reasons for believing that the testimony of the witness is likely to be relevant to the authorized scope of the investigation or proceeding;

In the case of process to secure the production of documents and materials, identify the person to whom the subpoena is to be directed; the general nature of the documents and materials in question; and the reasons for believing that such documents and materials are likely to be relevant to the authorized scope of the investigation or proceeding;

State whether confidential treatment of the application for and issuance of the subpoena is requested;

If the application is submitted on behalf of a person whose conduct is called into question, be accompanied by any materials in support of the application which such person desires to have transmitted to the court with the application; and

If the application is submitted on motion of the committee, be sought by the chairperson or acting chairperson only after notification to the person whose conduct is in issue that the subpoena will be sought.

The presiding judge shall act on such application within 48 hours after it is presented to the judge. If the judge finds that the committee is acting within the scope of the authority granted to it by the rules of the Senate or House and that the testimony or documents or materials sought to be elicited appear to be likely to be relevant to the authorized scope of the investigation or proceeding, the judge may cause an appropriate subpoena to be issued and transmitted to the chairperson or acting chairperson. If the judge deems it necessary or appropriate, the judge may hold a closed or open hearing with respect to his or her determination of this matter.

When authorized by the rules of the Senate and House, the confidential treatment of material and information in the course of investigations and other proceedings of the Committees on Ethics shall be recognized by law. Such confidential treatment shall be preserved in proceedings under this Code section as provided in this subsection. If the application for a subpoena requests confidential treatment, the court shall in any event take any and all steps necessary or appropriate to preserve the confidentiality of the application. The court may, but shall not be required to, issue the subpoena in such a manner as to preserve its confidentiality. If the court determines that a subpoena may be issued but confidential treatment is not warranted under the rules of the Senate or House, the judge shall so notify the chairperson or acting chairperson; and the chairperson or acting chairperson shall then have the option to:

Abandon the request for a subpoena, in which case the application shall remain confidential; or

Accept the determination of the court, in which case the subpoena shall issue, but the application and the issuance shall not be treated as confidential.

In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued under this Code section to any person, the Superior Court of Fulton County, upon application by the chairperson or acting chairperson, may issue to the person an order requiring him or her to appear before the court to show cause why he or she should not be held in contempt for refusal to obey the subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena may be punished by the court as contempt of court.

A subpoena issued under this Code section may be served at any place in this state and in any manner authorized in Code Section 24-13-24. Fees and mileage shall be paid and tendered as provided in Code Section 24-13-25, notwithstanding the general exemption of the state from tender of fees and mileage, and shall be in the form of a check issued by the Legislative Fiscal Office upon the written request of the chairperson or acting chairperson.

Any decision of the court under this Code section shall be appealable in the same manner as provided by law for the appeal of a final judgment in a civil action.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-1-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1390, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 28; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 40/HB 24.

Cross references.

General Assembly authorized to make investigations with same powers as Attorney General, § 45-15-19.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

28-1-17.
Prefiling of proposed bills and resolutions prior to each legislative session; administrative procedure.

The purpose of this Code section is to establish an administrative procedure for the prefiling of proposed bills and resolutions prior to the convening of each legislative session. The purposes of such procedure shall include:

Allowing, but not requiring, the author of a measure which he or she intends to introduce in the General Assembly to make the members of the General Assembly and the general public aware of the existence and contents of such proposed measure;

Allowing, but not requiring, the presiding officers of the Senate and House of Representatives to indicate the committees to which they intend to assign such proposed measures if and when they are officially introduced; and

Allowing, but not requiring, standing committees so selected to begin informal consideration of such proposed measures.

During the period which begins on November 15 of each calendar year and ends on the Friday before the second Monday in January of the following calendar year, bills and resolutions considered for introduction in the General Assembly may be prefiled with the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House as authorized in this Code section. Such measures may be so prefiled with the Secretary of the Senate by any one or more Senators who will be eligible to consider the measure when introduced. Such measures may be so prefiled with the Clerk of the House by any one or more Representatives who will be eligible to consider the measure when introduced. The prefiling of a measure shall not constitute the official introduction of a bill or resolution, and a bill or resolution may be officially introduced only during a legislative session.

When any one or more authors of a proposed measure desire to prefile the proposed measure, they shall obtain copies of the same from the Office of Legislative Counsel, prepared in a form to indicate their status as measures to be prefiled, and shall prefile the same with the Secretary of the Senate or the Clerk of the House in such manner as may be prescribed by the Secretary or the Clerk.

Neither the prefiling of a proposed measure by the author, an indication of intention to assign a proposed measure to a committee by a presiding officer, nor the informal consideration of a proposed measure by a committee shall be binding or have official status as the introduction, assignment to committee, or committee consideration of a measure; and all of such actions may officially be taken only after the convening of a session of the General Assembly.

Upon receipt of a prefiled bill or resolution, the Secretary or Clerk shall assign to the proposed measure an identifying number. The Secretary and Clerk may develop numbering systems which will allow prefiled measures to be identified by a number corresponding to the bill or resolution number which will be assigned to the same measure when and if it is officially introduced during the legislative session.

Following receipt of a prefiled measure, the Secretary or Clerk shall notify the presiding officer of the Senate or House, and such presiding officer may make a preliminary assignment of the measure to a standing committee for consideration by the committee. Such a preliminary assignment shall not constitute the official assignment of an officially introduced bill. Such official assignment of a bill or resolution may take place only following the official introduction of the bill or resolution during the legislative session. Such a preliminary assignment shall in no manner be binding upon the presiding officer, and the official assignment of a bill or resolution after its official introduction may be made without regard to any preliminary assignment of the proposed measure.

Upon the preliminary assignment of a bill or resolution, the committee to which the same is assigned may commence consideration of the proposed measure and the issues addressed therein, but the committee shall have no power to take any official action with respect to such a proposed measure until after its official introduction and assignment to the committee.

All measures prefiled under this Code section and the preliminary assignment of the same shall be matters of public record and shall be made available to the public.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-1-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1146, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, this Code section, enacted as
Code Section 28-1-16, was redesignated as
Code Section 28-1-17.